District of Columbia statutes.
46-404

Persons allowed to institute annulment proceedings.

A proceeding to declare the nullity of a marriage may be instituted in the case of an infant under the age of consent by such infant, through a next friend, or by the parent or guardian of such infant; and in the case of a person with mental illness, by next friend. But no such proceedings shall be allowed to be instituted by any person who, being fully capable of contracting a marriage, has knowingly and wilfully contracted any marriage declared illegal by the foregoing sections.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1392, ch. 854, § 1286
June 30, 1902, 32 Stat. 543, ch. 1329
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-169, § 23(e), 59 DCR 5567
Proceedings to annul marriage, see §§ 16-903, 16-904.
1981 Ed., § 30-104.
1973 Ed., § 30-104.
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-169 substituted “a person with mental illness” for “an idiot or lunatic” in the first sentence.
Section 35 of D.C. Law 19-169 provided that no provision of the act shall impair any right or obligation existing under law.